Hawaii statutes.
§454M-5 Additional duties
of a mortgage servicer; good faith and fair dealing; disclosures; payments, accounting, and records;
assignment of servicing rights. (a) A mortgage servicer licensed or acting under this chapter, has
a duty of good faith and fair dealing in its communications, transactions, and
course of dealings with each borrower in connection with the servicing of the
borrower's mortgage loan.

(b) In addition to any other
duties imposed by law, a mortgage servicer shall:

(1) Safeguard and account for any money
handled for the borrower;

(2) Follow reasonable and lawful
instructions from the borrower consistent with the underlying note and
mortgage;

(3) Act with reasonable skill,
care, timeliness, promptness, and diligence;

(4) Disclose to the commissioner in
the servicer's license application and each yearly renewal a complete, current
schedule of the ranges of costs and fees it charges borrowers for its
servicing-related activities;

(5) File a report with each yearly
renewal statement in a form and format acceptable to the commissioner detailing
the servicer's activities in this State, including:

(A) The number of mortgage loans the servicer
is servicing;

(B) The type and characteristics of loans
serviced in this State;

(C) The number of serviced loans in default,
along with a breakdown of thirty-, sixty-, and ninety-day delinquencies;

(D) Information on loss mitigation
activities, including details on workout arrangements undertaken;

(E) Information on foreclosures commenced in
this State;

(F) The affiliations of the mortgage
servicer, including any lenders or mortgagees for which the mortgage servicer
provides service, any subsidiary or parent entities of the mortgage servicer,
and a description of the authority held by the mortgage servicer through its
affiliations; and

(G) Any other information that the
commissioner may require; and

(6) Maintain an office in the State
that is staffed by at least one agent or employee for the purposes of
addressing consumer inquiries or complaints and accepting service of process;
provided that the mortgage servicer's business constitutes at least a twenty
per cent share of the portion of the total mortgage loan service market in the
State that was serviced by mortgage servicers licensed under this chapter
within the previous calendar year; and provided further that nothing in this
section shall prohibit a mortgagee as defined by section 667-1 or a mortgage
servicer from contracting with a licensee that maintains an office in this
State in conformity with this section for the purposes of addressing consumer
inquiries or complaints and accepting service of process.

(c)
A mortgage servicer shall comply with the following requirements concerning
handling and processing of mortgage payments:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (4),
all payments received by a mortgage servicer on a mortgage loan at the address
where the borrower has been instructed in writing to make payments shall be
accepted and credited, or treated as credited, on the business day received, to
the extent that the borrower has provided sufficient information to credit the
account. For all mortgage loans originated after July 1, 2015, except where
inconsistent with federal law or regulation, payments shall be credited to the
principal and interest due on the home loan before crediting the payments to
taxes, insurance, or fees;

(2) Methods of payment and payment
instruments shall be reasonable;

(3) If a mortgage servicer specifies in
writing requirements for the borrower to follow in making payments, but accepts
a payment that does not conform to the requirements, the mortgage servicer
shall credit the payment as soon as commercially practicable, but in no event
later than three business days after receipt;

(4) Late payments of principal and interest
shall be credited before any late charge is collected; and

(5) If the mortgage servicer receives any
payment on a mortgage loan and suspenses the payment, does not credit the
payment, or does not treat the payment in accordance with this section, the
mortgage servicer, within ten days of receipt, shall send the borrower notice
by mail at the borrower's last known address indicating the reason the payment
was suspensed or was not credited or treated as credited to the account, and specifying
any actions by the borrower necessary to make the loan current.

(d)
A mortgage servicer shall comply with the following requirements concerning
escrows for the payment of taxes and insurance:

(1) Any
mortgage servicer who
receives funds from a
borrower to be held in escrow for payment of taxes and insurance premiums shall pay the taxes
and insurance premiums of the borrower to the
appropriate taxing authority and insurance company in the amount required and
at the time the taxes and insurance premiums
are due, in accordance with the requirements of
the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, including title 12 C.F.R. section
1024.17, and shall be liable to the borrower as provided therein;

(2) If the
amount held in the escrow account as of the date the taxes and insurance premiums are due is
insufficient to pay the taxes and insurance premiums, the mortgage servicer
shall pay the taxes and insurance premiums from the mortgage servicer's own funds; provided that
the borrower has paid to the mortgage servicer the amounts required to be paid
into the escrow account, as determined by the mortgage servicer, for all
amounts scheduled to be paid to the mortgage servicer prior to the date the
taxes and insurance premiums are due; and

(3) Where an escrow account
has been established and a mortgage servicer advances funds in paying a
disbursement that is not the result of a borrower's payment default under the
underlying mortgage document, the mortgage servicer shall conduct an escrow
account analysis to determine the reasons for and extent of the deficiency and
shall provide a written explanation to the borrower before seeking repayment of
the funds from the borrower. The mortgage servicer shall then give the borrower the option
of paying the shortage over a period of not less than one year. The
mortgage servicer shall not charge or
collect interest on any shortage during the payment period.

Any
mortgage servicer who violates any provision of this
subsection shall be liable to the borrower: for any penalties, interest, or other charges levied by the taxing
authority or insurance company as a result of any violation; any actual damages suffered by the borrower as a
result of the violation, including any amount that would have been paid by an insurer for a casualty or
liability claim had the insurance
policy not been canceled for nonpayment by the mortgage servicer; and,
in the case of any successful action to
enforce the foregoing liability, the costs of the action together with
reasonable attorney's fees as determined by the court.

(e)
A mortgage servicer shall comply with the following requirements concerning
statements of account:

(1) At least once annually, within thirty
days of the end of the computation year, a mortgage servicer shall deliver to
the borrower a plain language statement of the borrower's account showing the
unpaid principal balance of the mortgage loan at the end of the immediately
preceding twelve-month period, the interest paid during that period, and the
amounts deposited into escrow and disbursed from escrow during the period. The
annual escrow statement may be provided separately from the annual statement
showing the unpaid principal and interest paid. The format and content of the
annual escrow statement shall comply with the Real Estate Settlement Procedures
Act, including title 12 C.F.R. section 1024.17;

(2) A mortgage servicer shall promptly
provide a borrower with an accurate accounting in plain English of the debt
owed when requested by the borrower or borrower's authorized representative.
Within thirty days of receipt of a request from the borrower or the borrower's
authorized representative, a mortgage servicer shall deliver to the borrower a
payment history for the last thirty-six months of the borrower's account, unless
a different period is requested, showing the date and amount of all payments
made or credited to the account and the total unpaid balance. The mortgage
servicer shall have sixty days to deliver a payment history where the request
is for a period longer than the last thirty-six months;

(3) A fee shall not be charged to the
borrower for the annual escrow statement or for one payment history furnished
to a borrower in a twelve-month period; and

(4) A shortage, surplus, or deficiency in
the escrow account shall be handled in accordance with the Real Estate
Settlement Procedures Act, including title 12 C.F.R. section 1024.17.
Alternatively, with the consent of the borrower, an excess balance may be
applied to the principal balance.

(f)
Except where inconsistent with the automatic stay provisions of the Bankruptcy
Code with respect to a borrower in a pending bankruptcy proceeding, a mortgage
servicer shall send a payment reminder notice to a borrower at the borrower's
last known address no later than seventeen days after the payment becomes due
and remains unpaid; provided that a mortgage servicer is not required to send a
separate payment reminder notice for each consecutive month in which the
mortgage loan continues to remain unpaid.

(g) A
mortgage servicer shall provide a clear, understandable, and accurate statement
of the total amount that is required to pay off the mortgage loan as of a
specified date, within a reasonable time, but in any event no more than five
business days after receipt of a request from the borrower or borrower's
authorized representative. No borrower shall be charged a fee for being
informed or receiving a payoff statement or for being provided with a release
upon full prepayment; provided that a mortgage servicer may charge a reasonable
fee for providing a payoff statement after five or more requests in any
calendar year.

(h)
A mortgage servicer shall comply with the following
requirements concerning handling consumer complaints and inquiries:

(1) A mortgage servicer shall follow the
requirements of the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, including requests
for error and information resolution procedures under title 12 C.F.R. sections
1024.35 and 1024.36;

(2) In addition to the requirements of the
Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, a mortgage servicer shall establish and
maintain a system to respond to and resolve borrower inquiries and complaints
in a prompt and appropriate manner;

(3) Within ten business days of receiving a
request in writing from a borrower or the borrower's authorized representative,
a mortgage servicer shall provide the borrower with the name, address, phone
number or electronic mail address, if available, and other relevant contact
information for the owner or assignee of the mortgage loan; and

(4) In addition to the information required
to be disclosed under this section, a mortgage servicer may, at its option,
provide any other information regarding the servicing of the loan that the
mortgage servicer believes would be helpful to a borrower; provided that any
additional information does not contradict or obscure the required disclosures.

(i)
A mortgage servicer shall comply with the following
requirements concerning fees:

(1) A mortgage servicer shall maintain and keep
current a schedule of standard or common fees that the mortgage servicer
charges borrowers for the servicer's servicing-related activities, such as
nonsufficient fund fees. The schedule shall identify
each fee, provide a plain English explanation of the fee, and state the
amount of the fee or range of amounts. If there is no standard fee, the
schedule shall explain how the fee is calculated or determined. A mortgage
servicer shall make its schedule available on the mortgage servicer's website
and to the borrower or the borrower's authorized
representative upon request;

(2) A mortgage servicer
may only collect a fee if the fee is for services actually rendered and one of
the following conditions is met:

(A) The fee is clearly and conspicuously
disclosed by the loan instruments and not prohibited by law;

(B) The fee is expressly permitted by law and
not prohibited by the loan instruments; or

(C) The fee is not prohibited by law or the
loan instruments and is a reasonable fee for a specific service requested by
the borrower that is assessed only after clear and conspicuous disclosure of
the fee is provided to the borrower and the borrower expressly consents to pay
the fee in exchange for the services;

(3) In addition to the limitations in
paragraph (2), attorneys' fees charged in connection with a foreclosure action
shall not exceed reasonable and customary fees for the work. If a foreclosure
action or proceeding is terminated prior to the public sale because of a loss
mitigation option, a reinstatement, or payment in full, the borrower shall only
be liable for reasonable and customary fees for work actually performed; and

(4) A mortgage servicer shall not impose any late fee or delinquency charge when the only delinquency is
attributable to late fees or delinquency charges assessed on an earlier payment and the payment is
otherwise a full payment for the applicable period and is paid on its due date or within any applicable
grace period. Late charges shall not be:

(A) Based on an amount greater than the past
due amount;

(B) Collected from the escrow account or from
escrow surplus without the approval of the borrower; or

(C) Deducted from any regular payment.

(j) Each mortgage servicer licensee shall maintain adequate records of each residential
mortgage loan transaction at the office named in the
mortgage servicer license for seven years.

(k)
Upon assignment of servicing rights on a residential mortgage loan,
the mortgage servicer shall disclose
to the borrower:

(1) Any notice required by the Real Estate
Settlement Procedures Act, including title 12 C.F.R. section 1024.33, within
the time periods prescribed therein; and

(2) A schedule of the ranges and categories
of the mortgage servicer's costs and fees for the servicer's servicing-related activities, which shall comply
with state and federal law and, if the disclosure is made by a mortgage
servicer licensee, shall not exceed
those reported to the commissioner in accordance with this chapter.

(l)
At the time a servicer accepts assignment of servicing rights for a mortgage
loan, the servicer shall disclose to the borrower all of the following:

(1) Any notice required by the Real Estate
Settlement Procedures Act;

(2) A schedule of the ranges and
categories of its costs and fees for its servicing-related activities, which
shall comply with this chapter and which shall not exceed those reported to the
commissioner; and

(3) A notice in a form and content
acceptable to the commissioner that the servicer is licensed by the
commissioner and that complaints about the servicer may be submitted to the
commissioner.

(m)
Where this chapter requires a person to comply with procedures, actions,
standards, disclosures, notices, format, content, or other requirements of the
Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, the required compliance applies to any
person subject to this chapter, whether or not the Real Estate Settlement
Procedures Act applies to that person or transaction. [L 2009, c 106, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 48, §10; am L 2012, c 182, §4; am L 2015, c 62, §5; am L 2016, c 122, §23]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next